Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-210
Captive propagation, defined.

Captive propagation means to hold live raptors in a controlled environment that is intensively manipulated by humans for the purpose of producing raptors of selected species and that has boundaries designed to prevent raptors, eggs, or gametes of the selected species from entering or leaving the controlled environment.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 20.